Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5341.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 46-22-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 46-22 entitled "Regulation
of Boats" is hereby amended to read as follows:
46-22-4. Identification number and registration fee.
(a)(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), the owner of each motorboat shall
file biennially an application for registration with the department of environmental management on
forms approved by the director. The application shall be accompanied by a registration fee
according to the following schedule:
OVERALL LENGTH
AT LEAST FEET NOT MORE THAN FEET BIENNIAL FEE
UNDER 15 $30
16 20 $40
21 25 $60
26 30 $100
31 35 $200
36 40 $250
41 45 $300
46 50 $400
51 and over $600

(i) For the purpose of the above fee schedule, “overall length” shall be defined as the
horizontal distance between the foremost part of the stem, and, the aftermost part of the stern,
excluding bowsprits, bumpkins, rudders, outboard motor brackets, and similar fittings or
attachments. For purposes of this section, a fraction of a foot shall be deemed to be the next higher
foot.
(ii) The fee payable under this section for any motorboat owned by a nonprofit organization
shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50.00).
(iii) All vessels over thirty feet (30′) may, upon request, pay the registration fee annually
at the rate of one-half (½) the biennial fee for a vessel of the same length.
(iv) In addition to the registration fee payable under this section, the owner of each
motorboat shall pay five dollars ($5.00) biennially. Pursuant to this section, where the owner of a
motorboat pays an annual registration fee, the additional fee shall be two dollars and fifty cents
($2.50) annually. The additional fees shall be deposited in a restricted account for freshwater
preservation as set forth in § 46-33-3.
(2) Upon receipt of the completed application and correct registration fee, the department
of environmental management shall enter the application and registration fee into its records, and
issue to the owner a certificate of number stating the number awarded to the motorboat and the
name and address of the owner. The owner shall paint on or attach to each side of the bow of the
motorboat the identification number in such manner as may be prescribed by rules and regulations
of the department of environmental management in order that it may be clearly visible. The number
shall be maintained in legible condition. The certificate of number shall be pocket size and shall be
available at all times for inspection on the motorboat for which issued, whenever that motorboat is
in operation.
(b) The owner of any motorboat already covered by an identification number, in full force
and effect, which has been awarded to it pursuant to then operative federal law or a federally
approved numbering system of another state, shall record the number with the department of
environmental management prior to operating the motorboat on the waters of this state in excess of
the ninety (90) day reciprocity period provided for in § 46-22-6(a). The recordation shall be in the
manner and subject to the procedure and fees required for the award and transfer of a number under
subsections (a) and (c) through (i), except that no additional or substitute number shall be issued.
(c) Should the ownership of a motorboat change, a new application form shall be filed with
the department of environmental management. Should the change in ownership take place before
the date upon which the certificate of number expires, the new owner shall pay an administrative
fee of ten dollars ($10.00). The number assigned to the vessel shall remain with the vessel and be
LC001083 - Page 2 of 5

non-transferable while the vessel remains certified in the state of Rhode Island; provided, however,
that upon the request of the owner of a duly registered vessel of historic value that is more than
fifty (50) years old, the number assigned to the vessel may be transferred to a different historic
vessel owned by the same person. The original vessel will be given a new registration number and
the owner shall pay a transfer fee of six dollars ($6.00) for each vessel.
(d) In the event that an agency of the United States government shall have in force an
overall system of identification numbering for motorboats within the United States, the numbering
system employed pursuant to this chapter by the department of environmental management shall
be in conformity therewith.
(e) All records of the department of environmental management made or kept pursuant to
this section shall be public records.
(f) The department of environmental management shall fix a day and month of the year on
which the certificate of number is due to expire and no longer be of any force and effect, unless
renewed pursuant to this chapter.
(g) The owner shall furnish the department of environmental management notice of the
transfer of all or any part of the owner’s interest, other than the creation of a security interest in a
motorboat numbered in this state, pursuant to subsections (a) and (b), or of the destruction or
abandonment of the motorboat, within fifteen (15) days thereof. That destruction shall terminate
the certificate of number for the motorboat.
(h) Any holder of a certificate of number shall notify the department of environmental
management within fifteen (15) days if the holder’s address no longer conforms to the address
appearing on the certificate and shall, as a part of the notification, furnish the department of
environmental management the new address. The department of environmental management may
provide, in its rules and regulations, for the surrender of the certificate bearing the former address
or for the alteration of an outstanding certificate to show the new address of the holder.
(i) No number, other than the number awarded to a motorboat or granted reciprocity
pursuant to this chapter, shall be painted, attached, or otherwise displayed on either side of the bow
of the motorboat.
(j) Biennial registration shall be phased in, alphabetically, over a two (2) year period
starting January 1, 1999 at which time all owners whose last names begin with the letters “A”
through “M” applications for registration will be accepted for consideration on a biennial basis.
Owners whose last names begin with the letters “N” through “Z” shall be subject to biennial
registration starting January 1, 2000.
SECTION 2. Chapter 46-33 of the General Laws entitled "Freshwater Lake Management
LC001083 - Page 3 of 5

Program" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
46-33-3. Establishment of restricted receipt account -- Collection and deposit of fees.
All fees collected by the director in accordance with § 46-22-4(a)(iv) shall be placed in a
restricted receipt account to be known as the "Rhode Island lake management program fund" for
the specific purposes of providing funding necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter
pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the department for the spending of the deposits
collected by the fund.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001083
========
LC001083 - Page 4 of 5